Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-109
Admission of attorneys from other states without examination.

Any person producing a license, or other satisfactory voucher, proving either that he has been regularly admitted an attorney at law in the courts of record of any state where the requirements for admission when he was admitted were equal to those prescribed in this state, or so proving that he has practiced law five full years in courts of record under license in any state, and proving also that he is a person of good moral character, may be admitted by the Supreme Court to the bar in this state without examination.

R.S.1866, c. 3, § 9, p. 15;

Laws 1903, c. 5, § 9, p. 55;

R.S.1913, § 273;

C.S.1922, § 268;

C.S.1929, § 7-109;

R.S.1943, § 7-109.

Section was not repealed as a whole by Chapter 6, Laws of 1895, but power of district court to admit was taken away by that act. In re Burton, 76 Neb. 752, 107 N.W. 1015 (1906).

District courts cannot admit, except in case pending. In re Admission to the Bar, 61 Neb. 58, 84 N.W. 611 (1900).